Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 11. Merger.

§79-14-1101.
Definitions.

In this article:

“Constituent limited partnership” means a constituent organization that is a limited partnership.

“Constituent organization” means an organization that is party to a merger.

“General partner” means a general partner of a limited partnership.

“Governing statute” of an organization means the statute that governs the organization’s internal affairs.

“Organization” means a general partnership, including a limited liability partnership; limited partnership, including a limited liability limited partnership; limited liability company; business trust; corporation; or any other person having a governing statute. The term includes domestic and foreign organizations whether or not organized for profit.

“Organizational documents” means:

“Personal liability” means personal liability for a debt, liability, or other obligation of an organization which is imposed on a person that co-owns, has an interest in, or is a member of the organization:

“Surviving organization” means an organization into which one or more other organizations are merged. A surviving organization may preexist the merger or be created by the merger.

For a domestic or foreign general partnership, its partnership agreement;

For a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership and partnership agreement;

For a domestic or foreign limited liability company, its articles of organization and operating agreement, or comparable records as provided in its governing statute;

For a business trust, its agreement of trust and declaration of trust;

For a domestic or foreign corporation for profit, its articles of incorporation, bylaws, and other agreements among its shareholders which are authorized by its governing statute, or comparable records as provided in its governing statute; and

For any other organization, the basic records that create the organization and determine its internal governance and the relations among the persons that own it, have an interest in it, or are members of it.

By the organization’s governing statute solely by reason of the person co-owning, having an interest in, or being a member of the organization; or

By the organization’s organizational documents under a provision of the organization’s governing statute authorizing those documents to make one or more specified persons liable for all or specified debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the organization solely by reason of the person or persons co-owning, having an interest in, or being a member of the organization.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1101 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1101, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the construction and application of former Chapter 14. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-1201.

§79-14-1102.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1102 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1102, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided the short title for former Chapter 14. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-101.

§79-14-1103.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1103 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1103, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] was a severability clause. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-1204.

§79-14-1104.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1104 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1104;
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 99;
Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 7, effective from and after July 1, 2014; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] was a list of fees the Secretary of State was authorized to charge and collect. For present similar provisions, see
§ 79-14-1301.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Fees for change of address or resignation of agency appointment by registered agent of limited partnership, see § 79-14-104.

Filing of certificates relative to limited partnerships upon receipt of fees required under this section, see § 79-14-206.

Requirement that all fees be paid before issuance of certificate of registration to foreign limited partnership, see § 79-14-903.

Requirement that foreign limited partnership pay fee when filing certificate correcting its application for registration, see § 79-14-905.

§79-14-1105.
[Reserved].

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1105 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1105, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] repealed former Chapter 13, which governed limited partnerships, limited partnerships under prior laws and foreign limited partnerships.

§79-14-1106.
Merger.

A limited partnership may merge with one or more other constituent organizations pursuant to this section and Sections 79-14-1107 through 79-14-1109 and a plan of merger, if:

The governing statute of each of the other organizations authorizes the merger;

The merger is not prohibited by the law of a jurisdiction that enacted any of those governing statutes; and

Each of the other organizations complies with its governing statute in effecting the merger.

If the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, the surviving organization’s organizational documents; and

If the surviving organization is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to be made by the merger to the surviving organization’s organizational documents.

A plan of merger must be in a record and must include:

The name and form of each constituent organization;

The name and form of the surviving organization and, if the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, a statement to that effect;

The terms and conditions of the merger, including the manner and basis for converting the interests in each constituent organization into any combination of money, interests in the surviving organization, and other consideration;

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1106 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1106; Laws, 1988, ch. 396, effective from and after passage (approved April 20, 1988); Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] related to the status of partnerships formed prior to January 1, 1988, transitional rules and a savings clause. For present similar provisions, see
§§ 79-14-112 and
79-14-1203.

§79-14-1107.
Action on plan of merger by constituent limited partnership.

Subject to Section 79-14-1110, a plan of merger must be consented to by all the partners of a constituent limited partnership.

Subject to Section 79-14-1110 and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before a filing is made under Section 79-14-1108, a constituent limited partnership may amend the plan or abandon the planned merger:

As provided in the plan; and

Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

A former
§ 79-14-1107 [Laws, 1987, ch. 488, § 1107, effective from and after January 1, 1988; Repealed by
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 6, effective from and after July 1, 2015.] provided that cases not provided for in former Chapter 14 were governed by the Mississippi Uniform Partnership Act ( § 79-13-101 et seq.).

Mississippi Uniform Partnership Act, see §§ 79-13-101 et seq.

§79-14-1108.
Filings required for merger; effective date.

After each constituent organization has approved a merger, articles of merger must be signed on behalf of:

Each preexisting constituent limited partnership, by each general partner listed in the certificate of limited partnership; and

Each other preexisting constituent organization, by an authorized representative.

The date the merger is effective under the governing statute of the surviving organization;

If the surviving organization is to be created by the merger:

If the surviving organization preexists the merger, any amendments provided for in the plan of merger for the organizational document that created the organization;

A statement as to each constituent organization that the merger was approved as required by the organization’s governing statute;

If the surviving organization is a foreign organization not authorized to transact business in this state, the street and mailing addresses of an office which the Secretary of State may use for the purposes of Section 79-14-1109(b); and

Any additional information required by the governing statute of any constituent organization.

The articles of merger must include:

The name and form of each constituent organization and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The name and form of the surviving organization, the jurisdiction of its governing statute, and, if the surviving organization is created by the merger, a statement to that effect;

If it will be a limited partnership, the limited partnership’s certificate of limited partnership; or

If it will be an organization other than a limited partnership, the organizational document that creates the organization;

Each constituent limited partnership shall deliver the articles of merger for filing in the Office of the Secretary of State.

A merger becomes effective under this article:

If the surviving organization is a limited partnership, upon the later of:

Compliance with subsection (c); or

Subject to Section 79-14-206(c), as specified in the articles of merger; or

If the surviving organization is not a limited partnership, as provided by the governing statute of the surviving organization.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1109.
Effect of merger.

When a merger becomes effective:

The surviving organization continues or comes into existence;

Each constituent organization that merges into the surviving organization ceases to exist as a separate entity;

All property owned by each constituent organization that ceases to exist vests in the surviving organization;

All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of each constituent organization that ceases to exist continue as obligations of the surviving organization;

An action or proceeding pending by or against any constituent organization that ceases to exist may be continued as if the merger had not occurred;

Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each constituent organization that ceases to exist vest in the surviving organization;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger, the terms and conditions of the plan of merger take effect;

Except as otherwise agreed, if a constituent limited partnership ceases to exist, the merger does not dissolve the limited partnership for the purposes of Article 8;

If the surviving organization is created by the merger:

If the surviving organization preexists the merger, any amendments provided for in the articles of merger for the organizational document that created the organization become effective.

If it is a limited partnership, the certificate of limited partnership becomes effective; or

If it is an organization other than a limited partnership, the organizational document that creates the organization becomes effective; and

A surviving organization that is a foreign organization consents to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any obligation owed by a constituent organization, if before the merger the constituent organization was subject to suit in this state on the obligation. A surviving organization that is a foreign organization and not authorized to transact business in this state appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process for the purposes of enforcing an obligation under this subsection. Service on the Secretary of State under this subsection is made in the same manner and with the same consequences as in the Mississippi Registered Agents Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

Mississippi Registered Agents Act, see § 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-14-1110.
Restrictions on approval of mergers and on relinquishing LLLP status.

If a partner of a constituent limited partnership will have personal liability with respect to a surviving organization, approval and amendment of a plan of merger are ineffective without the consent of the partner, unless:

The limited partnership’s partnership agreement provides for the approval of the merger with the consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner has consented to the provision of the partnership agreement.

An amendment to a certificate of limited partnership which deletes a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership is ineffective without the consent of each general partner unless:

The limited partnership’s partnership agreement provides for the amendment with the consent of less than all the general partners; and

Each general partner that does not consent to the amendment has consented to the provision of the partnership agreement.

A partner does not give the consent required by subsection (a) or (b) merely by consenting to a provision of the partnership agreement which permits the partnership agreement to be amended with the consent of fewer than all the partners.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1111.
Liability of general partner after merger.

A merger under this article does not discharge any liability under Sections 79-14-404 and 79-14-607 of a person that was a general partner in or dissociated as a general partner from a constituent limited partnership, but:

The provisions of this chapter pertaining to the collection or discharge of the liability continue to apply to the liability;

For the purposes of applying those provisions, the converted or surviving organization is deemed to be the constituent limited partnership; and

If a person is required to pay any amount under this subsection:

The person has a right of contribution from each other person that was liable as a general partner under Section 79-14-404 when the obligation was incurred and has not been released from the obligation under Section 79-14-607; and

The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of general partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligation was incurred.

In addition to any other liability provided by law:

A person that immediately before a merger became effective was a general partner in a constituent limited partnership that was not a limited liability limited partnership is personally liable for each obligation of the converted or surviving organization arising from a transaction with a third party after the merger becomes effective, if, at the time the third party enters into the transaction, the third party:

Does not have notice of the merger; and

Reasonably believes that:

The surviving business is the constituent limited partnership;

The constituent limited partnership is not a limited liability limited partnership; and

The person is a general partner in the constituent limited partnership; and

A person that was dissociated as a general partner from a constituent limited partnership before the merger became effective is personally liable for each obligation of the surviving organization arising from a transaction with a third party after the merger becomes effective, if:

Immediately before the merger became effective, the converted surviving limited partnership was not a limited liability limited partnership; and

At the time the third party enters into the transaction, less than two (2) years have passed since the person dissociated as a general partner and the third party:

Does not have notice of the dissociation;

Does not have notice of the merger; and

Reasonably believes that the surviving organization is the constituent limited partnership, the constituent limited partnership is not a limited liability limited partnership, and the person is a general partner in the constituent limited partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1112.
Power of general partners and persons dissociated as general partners to bind organization after merger.

An act of a person that immediately before a merger became effective was a general partner in a constituent limited partnership binds the surviving organization after the merger becomes effective, if:

Before the merger became effective, the act would have bound the constituent limited partnership under Section 79-14-402; and

At the time the third party enters into the transaction, the third party:

Does not have notice of the merger; and

Reasonably believes that the surviving business is the constituent limited partnership and that the person is a general partner in the constituent limited partnership.

An act of a person that before a merger became effective was dissociated as a general partner from a constituent limited partnership binds the converted or surviving organization after the merger becomes effective, if:

Before the merger became effective, the act would have bound the constituent limited partnership under Section 79-14-402 if the person had been a general partner; and

At the time the third party enters into the transaction, less than two (2) years have passed since the person dissociated as a general partner and the third party:

Does not have notice of the dissociation;

Does not have notice of the merger; and

Reasonably believes that the surviving organization is the constituent limited partnership and that the person is a general partner in the constituent limited partnership.

If a person having knowledge of the merger causes a surviving organization to incur an obligation under subsection (a) or (b), the person is liable:

To the converted or surviving organization for any damage caused to the organization arising from the obligation; and

If another person is liable for the obligation, to that other person for any damage caused to that other person arising from the liability.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§79-14-1113.
Article not exclusive.

This article does not preclude an entity from being converted or merged under other law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.